Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/de_DE.aff
FLAG num
SFX 2607 Y 1
SFX 2607 0 svertrags .
SFX 3725 Y 1
SFX 3725 0 managers .
SFX 2794 Y 1
SFX 2794 0 aufstellung .
SFX 4866 Y 1
SFX 4866 0 beere .
SFX 1654 Y 1
SFX 1654 0 dateien .
SFX 941 Y 1
SFX 941 0 lerinnen .
SFX 2254 Y 1
SFX 2254 0 ndstem .
SFX 1860 Y 1
SFX 1860 0 ndsten .
SFX 1908 Y 1
SFX 1908 0 ndster .
SFX 1955 Y 1
SFX 1955 0 ndstes .
SFX 3439 Y 1
SFX 3439 0 züchtern .
SFX 3551 Y 1
SFX 3551 0 züchters .
SFX 3446 Y 1
SFX 3446 0 vergleichs .
SFX 2422 Y 1
SFX 2422 0 chlüssel .
SFX 2925 Y 1
SFX 2925 0 chlags .
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 0 ors .
SFX 745 Y 1
SFX 745 0 ort .
SFX 3914 Y 1
SFX 3914 0 smengen .
SFX 4958 Y 1
SFX 4958 0 sdauern .
SFX 4254 Y 1
SFX 4254 0 sstück .
SFX 4301 Y 1
SFX 4301 0 nplatzes .
SFX 4025 Y 1
SFX 4025 0 tuhls .
SFX 1064 Y 1
SFX 1064 0 sgrade .
SFX 1340 Y 1
SFX 1340 0 hafen .
SFX 4342 Y 1
SFX 4342 0 fabrikationen .
SFX 1501 Y 1
SFX 1501 0 einstellung .
SFX 3507 Y 1
SFX 3507 0 initiativen .
SFX 1499 Y 1
SFX 1499 0 frau .
SFX 4630 Y 1
SFX 4630 0 körben .
SFX 2242 Y 1
SFX 2242 0 sleitungen .
SFX 3668 Y 1
SFX 3668 0 winkeln .
SFX 3667 Y 1
SFX 3667 0 winkels .
SFX 1846 Y 1
SFX 1846 0 swelle .
SFX 3716 Y 1
SFX 3716 0 sagenturen .
SFX 3201 Y 1
SFX 3201 0 auffassungen .
SFX 3416 Y 1
SFX 3416 0 creme .
SFX 4863 Y 1
SFX 4863 0 betrachtung .
SFX 3144 Y 1
SFX 3144 0 ngesetze .
SFX 138 Y 1
SFX 138 0 hauses .
SFX 4250 Y 1
SFX 4250 0 stemperatur .
SFX 3288 Y 1
SFX 3288 0 gürteln .
SFX 3085 Y 1
SFX 3085 0 gürtels .
SFX 3148 Y 1
SFX 3148 0 nberg .
SFX 2421 Y 1
SFX 2421 0 chlüsseln .
SFX 2420 Y 1
SFX 2420 0 chlüssels .
SFX 596 Y 1
SFX 596 0 aktivität .
SFX 1819 Y 1
SFX 1819 0 konzerne .
SFX 1914 Y 1
SFX 1914 0 konzerns .
SFX 2135 Y 1
SFX 2135 0 armeen .
SFX 2355 Y 1
SFX 2355 0 nanlagen .
SFX 1976 Y 1
SFX 1976 0 ausgleich .
SFX 1682 Y 1
SFX 1682 0 äpfeln .
SFX 4272 Y 1
SFX 4272 0 sflüge .
SFX 3071 Y 1
SFX 3071 0 leiste .
SFX 4977 Y 1
SFX 4977 0 rhöhung .
SFX 4193 Y 1
SFX 4193 0 fragmenten .
SFX 4835 Y 1
SFX 4835 0 fragmentes .
SFX 1983 Y 1
SFX 1983 0 technologie .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 srechte .
SFX 2108 Y 1
SFX 2108 0 srechts .
SFX 4276 Y 1
SFX 4276 0 sdrucken .
SFX 2012 Y 1
SFX 2012 0 förderung .
SFX 2441 Y 1
SFX 2441 0 tandorte .
SFX 440 Y 1
SFX 440 0 basis .
SFX 3162 Y 1
SFX 3162 0 ingenieurin .
SFX 4499 Y 1
SFX 4499 0 flagge .
SFX 1728 Y 1
SFX 1728 0 formation .
SFX 4879 Y 1
SFX 4879 0 ansprüchen .
SFX 1755 Y 1
SFX 1755 0 kameras .
SFX 3808 Y 1
SFX 3808 0 schlössern .
SFX 4632 Y 1
SFX 4632 0 konten .
SFX 1118 Y 1
SFX 1118 0 sprinzip .
SFX 3979 Y 1
SFX 3979 0 ecke .
SFX 3173 Y 1
SFX 3173 0 fan .
SFX 2413 Y 1
SFX 2413 0 fahrerinnen .
SFX 1319 Y 1
SFX 1319 0 baums .
SFX 3471 Y 1
SFX 3471 0 sgrenze .
SFX 2094 Y 1
SFX 2094 0 blech .
SFX 118 Y 1
SFX 118 0 abteilung .
SFX 4963 Y 1
SFX 4963 0 sblöcke .
SFX 345 Y 1
SFX 345 0 leistungen .
SFX 3940 Y 1
SFX 3940 0 reinigung .
SFX 4047 Y 1
SFX 4047 0 spotential .
SFX 2023 Y 1
SFX 2023 0 verteilung .
SFX 2606 Y 1
SFX 2606 0 tabellen .
SFX 4609 Y 1
SFX 4609 0 pulvers .
SFX 4217 Y 1
SFX 4217 0 attacke .
SFX 2450 Y 1
SFX 2450 0 sfalles .
SFX 4752 Y 1
SFX 4752 0 sgrundsätzen .
SFX 4924 Y 1
SFX 4924 0 struppe .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 0 sschutzes .
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 0 rweise .
SFX 3877 Y 1
SFX 3877 0 ansammlung .
SFX 4981 Y 1
SFX 4981 0 perioden .
SFX 2320 Y 1
SFX 2320 0 depot .
SFX 1348 Y 1
SFX 1348 0 angelegenheit .
SFX 2477 Y 1
SFX 2477 0 gutes .
SFX 2637 Y 1
SFX 2637 0 mauer .
SFX 4074 Y 1
SFX 4074 0 plans .
SFX 1028 Y 1
SFX 1028 0 besitzern .
SFX 1006 Y 1
SFX 1006 0 besitzers .
SFX 3726 Y 1
SFX 3726 0 manager .
SFX 4601 Y 1
SFX 4601 0 sbeitrages .
SFX 2590 Y 1
SFX 2590 0 balkens .
SFX 4061 Y 1
SFX 4061 0 schreibern .
SFX 4060 Y 1
SFX 4060 0 schreibers .
SFX 1060 Y 1
SFX 1060 0 abdeckung .
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 0 brücke .
SFX 2473 Y 1
SFX 2473 0 ige .
SFX 4600 Y 1
SFX 4600 0 sbestand .
SFX 4556 Y 1
SFX 4556 0 verbands .
SFX 639 Y 1
SFX 639 0 element .
SFX 333 Y 1
SFX 333 0 straßen .
SFX 1857 Y 1
SFX 1857 0 pflege .
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 0 kind .
SFX 3846 Y 1
SFX 3846 0 kino .
SFX 2554 Y 1
SFX 2554 0 saison .
SFX 2215 Y 1
SFX 2215 0 halten .
SFX 1001 Y 1
SFX 1001 0 halter .
SFX 1889 Y 1
SFX 1889 0 turnieren .
SFX 3207 Y 1
SFX 3207 0 ämtern .
SFX 3406 Y 1
SFX 3406 0 fraktur .
SFX 1410 Y 1
SFX 1410 0 steile .
SFX 1409 Y 1
SFX 1409 0 steils .
SFX 2131 Y 1
SFX 2131 0 dorfes .
SFX 1289 Y 1
SFX 1289 0 haltung .
SFX 1742 Y 1
SFX 1742 0 taat .
SFX 1836 Y 1
SFX 1836 0 autor .
SFX 2019 Y 1
SFX 2019 0 autos .
SFX 1148 Y 1
SFX 1148 0 zellen .
SFX 2897 Y 1
SFX 2897 0 raten .
SFX 923 Y 1
SFX 923 0 rates .
SFX 3820 Y 1
SFX 3820 0 öls .
SFX 4800 Y 1
SFX 4800 0 nforschung .
SFX 1418 Y 1
SFX 1418 0 posten .
SFX 1414 Y 1
SFX 1414 0 sfaktors .
SFX 1222 Y 1
SFX 1222 0 höfen .
SFX 58 Y 1
SFX 58 0 bereich .
SFX 4972 Y 1
SFX 4972 0 runden .
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 sverfahren .
SFX 1056 Y 1
SFX 1056 0 peicher .
SFX 3797 Y 1
SFX 3797 0 srechnungen .
SFX 4091 Y 1
SFX 4091 0 kloster .
SFX 3985 Y 1
SFX 3985 0 chere .
SFX 4971 Y 1
SFX 4971 0 saufnahme .
SFX 2687 Y 1
SFX 2687 0 splanungen .
SFX 4256 Y 1
SFX 4256 0 sschreibens .
SFX 3778 Y 1
SFX 3778 0 tuhl .
SFX 3440 Y 1
SFX 3440 0 züchter .
SFX 595 Y 1
SFX 595 0 bestimmungen .
SFX 2263 Y 1
SFX 2263 0 komponente .
SFX 413 Y 1
SFX 413 0 achse .
SFX 1920 Y 1
SFX 1920 0 fischen .
SFX 1254 Y 1
SFX 1254 0 kammern .
SFX 2428 Y 1
SFX 2428 0 ards .
SFX 2046 Y 1
SFX 2046 0 flasche .
SFX 194 Y 1
SFX 194 0 teil .
SFX 584 Y 1
SFX 584 0 tein .
SFX 3469 Y 1
SFX 3469 0 smodus .
SFX 1694 Y 1
SFX 1694 0 leuten .
SFX 805 Y 1
SFX 805 0 igung .
SFX 2565 Y 1
SFX 2565 0 lampen .
SFX 3443 Y 1
SFX 3443 0 wissenschaft .
SFX 989 Y 1
SFX 989 0 bestandes .
SFX 1520 Y 1
SFX 1520 0 sleistung .
SFX 3055 Y 1
SFX 3055 0 sfahrzeug .
SFX 2163 Y 1
SFX 2163 0 pur .
SFX 1322 Y 1
SFX 1322 0 antrag .
SFX 386 Y 1
SFX 386 0 smittel .
SFX 1190 Y 1
SFX 1190 0 ärztin .
SFX 3680 Y 1
SFX 3680 0 termin .
SFX 3733 Y 1
SFX 3733 0 gewicht .
SFX 4300 Y 1
SFX 4300 0 nsammlung .
SFX 3293 Y 1
SFX 3293 0 feuern .
SFX 2579 Y 1
SFX 2579 0 feuers .
SFX 3226 Y 1
SFX 3226 0 tarif .
SFX 2524 Y 1
SFX 2524 0 nern .
SFX 2706 Y 1
SFX 2706 0 ners .
SFX 685 Y 1
SFX 685 0 stätten .
SFX 4332 Y 1
SFX 4332 0 hauben .
SFX 4253 Y 1
SFX 4253 0 standards .
SFX 458 Y 1
SFX 458 0 typs .
SFX 4533 Y 1
SFX 4533 0 abnahmen .
SFX 533 Y 1
SFX 533 0 chiffe .
SFX 625 Y 1
SFX 625 0 chiffs .
SFX 3805 Y 1
SFX 3805 0 sfällen .
SFX 206 Y 1
SFX 206 0 angebote .
SFX 263 Y 1
SFX 263 0 angebots .
SFX 1021 Y 1
SFX 1021 0 sdauer .
SFX 743 Y 1
SFX 743 0 svertrag .
SFX 2384 Y 1
SFX 2384 0 szeichen .
SFX 3185 Y 1
SFX 3185 0 chränke .
SFX 4933 Y 1
SFX 4933 0 ssteuerung .
SFX 581 Y 1
SFX 581 0 baumes .
SFX 1519 Y 1
SFX 1519 0 slinien .
SFX 2119 Y 1
SFX 2119 0 krise .
SFX 965 Y 1
SFX 965 0 messungen .
SFX 3588 Y 1
SFX 3588 0 sfreiheiten .
SFX 2159 Y 1
SFX 2159 0 sauftrages .
SFX 4297 Y 1
SFX 4297 0 nzahl .
SFX 1608 Y 1
SFX 1608 0 entscheidung .
SFX 4389 Y 1
SFX 4389 0 tühle .
SFX 3556 Y 1
SFX 3556 0 wochen .
SFX 906 Y 1
SFX 906 0 tationen .
SFX 690 Y 1
SFX 690 0 firmen .
SFX 486 Y 1
SFX 486 0 erie .
SFX 56 Y 1
SFX 56 0 erin .
SFX 3759 Y 1
SFX 3759 0 belag .
SFX 113 Y 1
SFX 113 0 buch .
SFX 396 Y 1
SFX 396 0 einsatz .
SFX 169 Y 1
SFX 169 0 verband .
SFX 4665 Y 1
SFX 4665 0 erscheinungen .
SFX 4422 Y 1
SFX 4422 0 skanal .
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 0 direktionen .
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 0 gesetz .
SFX 2872 Y 1
SFX 2872 0 twürfe .
SFX 1801 Y 1
SFX 1801 0 benen .
SFX 4864 Y 1
SFX 4864 0 beraterin .
SFX 3552 Y 1
SFX 3552 0 züchterin .
SFX 3235 Y 1
SFX 3235 0 stätigkeiten .
SFX 1407 Y 1
SFX 1407 0 teams .
SFX 4590 Y 1
SFX 4590 0 sfilmen .
SFX 4913 Y 1
SFX 4913 0 terne .
SFX 1779 Y 1
SFX 1779 0 sfelder .
SFX 1811 Y 1
SFX 1811 0 sfeldes .
SFX 2743 Y 1
SFX 2743 0 woche .
SFX 3091 Y 1
SFX 3091 0 erklärungen .
SFX 1203 Y 1
SFX 1203 0 höfe .
SFX 1221 Y 1
SFX 1221 0 ignal .
SFX 2621 Y 1
SFX 2621 0 sband .
SFX 4770 Y 1
SFX 4770 0 sbank .
SFX 1136 Y 1
SFX 1136 0 smechanismen .
SFX 1637 Y 1
SFX 1637 0 oren .
SFX 4651 Y 1
SFX 4651 0 gebnisse .
SFX 583 Y 1
SFX 583 0 anschlusses .
SFX 1698 Y 1
SFX 1698 0 jahre .
SFX 2121 Y 1
SFX 2121 0 jahrs .
SFX 3766 Y 1
SFX 3766 0 ammlern .
SFX 3880 Y 1
SFX 3880 0 ammlers .
SFX 2494 Y 1
SFX 2494 0 abwehr .
SFX 2073 Y 1
SFX 2073 0 sbilder .
SFX 2197 Y 1
SFX 2197 0 sbildes .
SFX 3837 Y 1
SFX 3837 0 nanteile .
SFX 3835 Y 1
SFX 3835 0 nanteils .
SFX 705 Y 1
SFX 705 0 produkten .
SFX 911 Y 1
SFX 911 0 produktes .
SFX 1160 Y 1
SFX 1160 0 zig .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 bild .
SFX 3739 Y 1
SFX 3739 0 gemisch .
SFX 68 Y 1
SFX 68 0 system .
SFX 3295 Y 1
SFX 3295 0 fasern .
SFX 3997 Y 1
SFX 3997 0 atome .
SFX 4526 Y 1
SFX 4526 0 atoms .
SFX 3898 Y 1
SFX 3898 0 tandes .
SFX 4460 Y 1
SFX 4460 0 mütze .
SFX 1878 Y 1
SFX 1878 0 begrenzungen .
SFX 1783 Y 1
SFX 1783 0 präsident .
SFX 4596 Y 1
SFX 4596 0 schuh .
SFX 3501 Y 1
SFX 3501 0 lehrern .
SFX 3728 Y 1
SFX 3728 0 lehrers .
SFX 2173 Y 1
SFX 2173 0 faches .
SFX 678 Y 1
SFX 678 0 sdiensten .
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 sdienstes .
SFX 3330 Y 1
SFX 3330 0 zeitschrift .
SFX 3324 Y 1
SFX 3324 0 anwalt .
SFX 3258 Y 1
SFX 3258 0 pflegen .
SFX 3608 Y 1
SFX 3608 0 nleiter .
SFX 3863 Y 1
SFX 3863 0 chlangen .
SFX 967 Y 1
SFX 967 0 inseln .
SFX 4983 Y 1
SFX 4983 0 pender .
SFX 2907 Y 1
SFX 2907 0 messen .
SFX 1092 Y 1
SFX 1092 0 messer .
SFX 4470 Y 1
SFX 4470 0 lnd .
SFX 2168 Y 1
SFX 2168 0 ladens .
SFX 2306 Y 1
SFX 2306 0 papiere .
SFX 1524 Y 1
SFX 1524 0 papiers .
SFX 520 Y 1
SFX 520 0 klub .
SFX 4821 Y 1
SFX 4821 0 intrags .
SFX 4922 Y 1
SFX 4922 0 sverwaltungen .
SFX 399 Y 1
SFX 399 0 wesens .
SFX 2931 Y 1
SFX 2931 0 becher .
SFX 2102 Y 1
SFX 2102 0 wand .
SFX 3640 Y 1
SFX 3640 0 center .
SFX 477 Y 1
SFX 477 0 ammlungen .
SFX 648 Y 1
SFX 648 0 schrift .
SFX 232 Y 1
SFX 232 0 punkt .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 instituten .
SFX 3762 Y 1
SFX 3762 0 aren .
SFX 3255 Y 1
SFX 3255 0 rakete .
SFX 3236 Y 1
SFX 3236 0 ssprachen .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 expertinnen .
SFX 4031 Y 1
SFX 4031 0 tellern .
SFX 3681 Y 1
SFX 3681 0 tellers .
SFX 3758 Y 1
SFX 3758 0 buden .
SFX 4934 Y 1
SFX 4934 0 sstatus .
SFX 123 Y 1
SFX 123 0 büchern .
SFX 4195 Y 1
SFX 4195 0 fahrungen .
SFX 1518 Y 1
SFX 1518 0 smaschine .
SFX 3130 Y 1
SFX 3130 0 schildern .
SFX 3421 Y 1
SFX 3421 0 besucherin .
SFX 63 Y 1
SFX 63 0 arten .
SFX 193 Y 1
SFX 193 0 teilen .
SFX 2339 Y 1
SFX 2339 0 sstörungen .
SFX 2906 Y 1
SFX 2906 0 minister .
SFX 1225 Y 1
SFX 1225 0 flugzeug .
SFX 1622 Y 1
SFX 1622 0 swege .
SFX 4136 Y 1
SFX 4136 0 szeitraumes .
SFX 2166 Y 1
SFX 2166 0 perren .
SFX 1684 Y 1
SFX 1684 0 ache .
SFX 3881 Y 1
SFX 3881 0 acht .
SFX 735 Y 1
SFX 735 0 motoren .
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 0 atik .
SFX 3016 Y 1
SFX 3016 0 zielen .
SFX 4703 Y 1
SFX 4703 0 zieles .
SFX 1404 Y 1
SFX 1404 0 verbände .
SFX 4618 Y 1
SFX 4618 0 nest .
SFX 1549 Y 1
SFX 1549 0 statt .
SFX 3623 Y 1
SFX 3623 0 güter .
SFX 4799 Y 1
SFX 4799 0 nfunktionen .
SFX 2304 Y 1
SFX 2304 0 sakten .
SFX 962 Y 1
SFX 962 0 stagen .
SFX 2107 Y 1
SFX 2107 0 stages .
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 piele .
SFX 2401 Y 1
SFX 2401 0 mission .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 piels .
SFX 3145 Y 1
SFX 3145 0 ngeschäften .
SFX 2903 Y 1
SFX 2903 0 ngeschäftes .
SFX 3475 Y 1
SFX 3475 0 sblättern .
SFX 604 Y 1
SFX 604 0 einrichtung .
SFX 203 Y 1
SFX 203 0 dienste .
SFX 783 Y 1
SFX 783 0 antrieben .
SFX 4241 Y 1
SFX 4241 0 svorsitzenden .
SFX 4137 Y 1
SFX 4137 0 svorsitzender .
SFX 1299 Y 1
SFX 1299 0 wettbewerben .
SFX 420 Y 1
SFX 420 0 sarbeit .
SFX 2340 Y 1
SFX 2340 0 splanung .
SFX 1208 Y 1
SFX 1208 0 chlag .
SFX 4163 Y 1
SFX 4163 0 probe .
SFX 1913 Y 1
SFX 1913 0 landschaften .
SFX 122 Y 1
SFX 122 0 anteil .
SFX 2945 Y 1
SFX 2945 0 waren .
SFX 4408 Y 1
SFX 4408 0 studenten .
SFX 2044 Y 1
SFX 2044 0 jahren .
SFX 1865 Y 1
SFX 1865 0 jahres .
SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 0 gesellschaft .
SFX 3188 Y 1
SFX 3188 0 bude .
SFX 3993 Y 1
SFX 3993 0 baustein .
SFX 1727 Y 1
SFX 1727 0 holzes .
SFX 3916 Y 1
SFX 3916 0 siege .
SFX 3587 Y 1
SFX 3587 0 siegs .
SFX 1432 Y 1
SFX 1432 0 steuer .
SFX 3514 Y 1
SFX 3514 0 handbücher .
SFX 3738 Y 1
SFX 3738 0 geometrie .
SFX 3746 Y 1
SFX 3746 0 falls .
SFX 2967 Y 1
SFX 2967 0 sfahrzeuge .
